Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.11
Nursing facility, defined.

Nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-424.

Laws 1991, LB 244, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5809.02;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 15;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 118.